exercise2/en_ip_adjectives_rules_cascade.xfst
! Clear away any possible old data from the system
clear stack

! Read lexicon and make a regex of it
read lexc en_ip_adjectives_lexicon.lexc
define Lexicon ;
regex Lexicon ;

define Vowel [ a | e | i | o | u | y ] ;
define Cons  [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | 
               n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z ] ;

! y/i alternation
define YToI	y -> i || _ %^ e ;

! Consonant reduplication
define DoubleCons d -> d d , 
       		  g -> g g , 
		  m -> m m ,
		  t -> t t || Cons Vowel _ %^ e ;
define DropE      e -> 0 || _ %^ e (r | s t) ;


! Last rule cleans away the boundary marker
define CleanUp  %^ -> 0 ;

! Compose lexicon with rules
regex Lexicon .o. YToI .o. DoubleCons .o. DropE .o. CleanUp ;

! Output all surface forms of the words
lower-words
